apertium-epo-fra.fra.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 7
	Entries: 44691
	Sdefs: 78
	Paradigms: 398
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix apertium-eo-fr.fr.dix.new2 apertium-eo-fr.fr.dix.new3

-->
<dictionary>
<!--
        procezita per:
apertium-dixtools format apertium-eo-fr.fr.dix apertium-eo-fr.fr.dix.new
apertium-dixtools sort -ignorecase -alignMonodix -stripEmptyLines -group n,adj,adjadv,adv,np,cnjadv,pr,vblex,vblex_symbol,n_symbol,adj_symbol,adv_symbol,pr_symbol,cnjadv_symbol,preadv,ij,vbmod,cnjcoo,predet,cnjsub,vbser,vbhaver,num,num_symbol,det,det_symbol,rel,prn,prn_symbol apertium-eo-fr.fr.dix.new apertium-eo-fr.fr.dix.new2
apertium-dixtools fix apertium-eo-fr.fr.dix.new2 apertium-eo-fr.fr.dix.new3
-->

  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÃÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÕŒÙÚÛÜàáâäãçèéêëìíîïñòóôöõœøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭąĄčČćĆđĐęĘłŁŀĿńŃőŐřšŠśŚžŽźŹżŻÆæØøÅåăĂşșȘțȚıİğĞ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="cit" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="lcit" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="percent" /> 
    <sdef n="ciph" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="ppres" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="preadj" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="qnt" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="rcit" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="ND" />
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
<pardef n="ö">
  <e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>ö</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oe</l>        <r>ö</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!--
<pardef n="œ">
  <e>       <p><l>œ</l>         <r>œ</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oe</l>        <r>œ</r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->
<pardef n="ü">
  <e>       <p><l>ü</l>         <r>ü</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ü</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="D">               <i>D</i><par n="ö"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jürgen">          <i>J</i><par n="ü"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Abraham__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jürgen Trumpf">   <i>J</i><par n="ü"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Abraham__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pöttering">       <i>P</i><par n="ö"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tönis">           <i>T</i><par n="ö"/><i>nis</i><par n="Abraham__np"/></e>
